Alaska, session 34, SB286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 19.40 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Sec. 19.40.215. James Dalton Highway toll. (a) The portion of the James 06 Dalton Highway between milepost 413 and milepost 415 near Deadhorse, Alaska, is 07 designated as a toll road. 08 (b) Except as provided under (c) of this section, the department shall collect a 09 toll for passage on the toll road by a vehicle that is transporting personnel or goods for 10 use by an oil or gas developer, explorer, or producer. The department shall annually 11 set toll rates so that the total amount of tolls collected approximately equals the 12 portion of actual maintenance and repair costs for the highway caused by use of the 13 highway by oil and gas developers, explorers, and producers. 14 (c) The department may not charge a toll for a vehicle that 01 (1) is engaged in transporting personnel or goods for use by the 02 Alyeska Pipeline Service Company; or 03 (2) is not transporting personnel or goods for use by an oil or gas 04 developer, explorer, or producer. 05 (d) An operator of a vehicle who pays a toll under this section while 06 transporting personnel or goods for use by an oil or gas developer, explorer, or 07 producer may request reimbursement of the toll from the developer, explorer, or 08 producer. The oil or gas developer, explorer, or producer shall reimburse the operator 09 within 30 days after the operator submits a request for reimbursement. 10 (e) An operator of a vehicle who pays a toll under this section may institute an 11 action in the superior court if an oil or gas developer, explorer, or producer fails to 12 reimburse the operator as provided under (d) of this section. If an operator bringing an 13 action prevails, the operator is entitled to full reasonable attorney fees and costs. 14 (f) The department shall separately account for the revenue collected from the 15 tolls under this section. The legislature may appropriate the revenue collected under 16 this section to the department for maintaining and repairing the highway. 17 (g) In this section, 18 (1) "explorer" has the meaning given in AS 43.55.900; 19 (2) "producer" has the meaning given in AS 43.55.900. 20 * Sec. 2. AS 37.05.146(c) is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 21 (87) revenue collected from James Dalton Highway tolls 22 (AS 19.40.215). 23 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect July 1, 2028. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.